Utah statutes.
63A-12-110.   Online training course.

(1)  As used in this section, "records officer" is as defined in Section 63G-2-103.

(2)  The division shall:

(a)  develop an online training course for records officers of all governmental entities and political subdivisions;

(b)  make the online training course available on or before January 1, 2013;

(c)  on an annual basis, provide certification to a records officer after the records officer successfully completes the online training course; and

(d)  post a list on its website of all records officers, including for each:

(i)  the name of the records officer;

(ii)  the name of the governmental entity or political subdivision to which the records officer provides services as a records officer;

(iii)  contact information for the records officer;

(iv)  the most recent date on which the records officer completed the online training course; and

(v)  the date on which the records officer's certification expires.

(3)  The online training course described in this section shall train a records officer regarding the provisions of:

(a)  Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act;

(b)  rules made under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act; and

(c)  other legal and policy matters relating to responding to a public records request.

(4)  The division:

(a)  shall develop the online training course in consultation with the attorney general's office; and

(b)  may make rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.



Enacted by Chapter 377, 2012 General Session

